New York, session 2025-2026, S1723.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 911 of the execu- 2 tive law, as separately amended by chapters 382 and 397 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) the state's major creeks and brooks comprised of the 18 Mile Creek 5 located in Erie county, Chittenango Creek, Bash Bish and Kinderhook 6 Creek located in Columbia county, Kinderhook Creek located in Rensselaer 7 county, Basher Kill, Bushkill, Cattaraugus, Cayadutta, North Chuctanun- 8 da, Cincinnati, East Kill, Esopus (including upper and lower branches), 9 Ferguson, Fish (including east and west branches), Gooseberry, Great 10 Valley, Kennyetto, Little Sandy, Moyer, Mud Creek located in Oneida 11 county, Ninemile Creek, Onondaga, Oriskany, Peekskill Hollow, Reall, 12 Roeliff Jansen Kill, Rondout, Sandy, Sauquoit, Schoharie, Shawangunk 13 Kill, Six Mile Creek, South Sandy, Oatka, Tonawanda, West Kill, Scaja- 14 quada, Wappinger, Webatuck, Wassaic, Willsey in the village of Wurts- 15 boro, Wood Creek located in Herkimer county, Wood Creek located in Onei- 16 da county, Black Creek located in Monroe county, Black Creek located in 17 Genesee and Wyoming counties, Ellicott Creek located in Erie county, 18 Wynantskill, Claverack, Taghkanic, Agawamuck, Wyomanock, and Ley Creek 19 and Butternut Creek located in Onondaga county, Nanticoke and Sawkill 20 (in Ulster county), Saw Kill and Fall Kill located in Dutchess county, 21 Otter Kill Creek located in Orange county, Black Meadow Creek located in 22 Orange county, [and] the Silver Lake Outlet located in Wyoming county, 23 and the Doodletown Brook located in Rockland county; 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01375-01-5